Hawaii, session 2026, SB1364.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  This Act is recommended by the governor for immediate passage in accordance with section 9 of article VII of the Constitution of the State of Hawaii. SECTION 2. Section 3 of Act 164, Session Laws of Hawaii 2023, as amended by Act 230, Session Laws of Hawaii 2024, appropriated general funds to the department of accounting and general services in fiscal year 2024-2025 for interdepartmental transfer to the department of law enforcement for payroll costs of sheriffs.  Similarly, section 3 of Act 70, Session Laws of Hawaii 2023, as amended by Act 233, Session Laws of Hawaii 2024, appropriated general funds in fiscal year 2024-2025 to the judiciary for interdepartmental transfer to the department of law enforcement for payroll costs of sheriffs. While appropriations for payroll costs out of the general fund of the State of Hawaii exclude fringe benefit costs, fringe benefits must be included if an appropriation for interdepartmental transfer is used to fund positions.  Because these aforementioned appropriation amounts did not include fringe benefits, a critical funding shortage exists, and additional funds must be appropriated to cover fringe benefit costs for affected law enforcement personnel of the department of law enforcement. The purpose of this Act is to make emergency appropriations to the department of accounting and general services and the judiciary to provide funds to cover payroll and fringe benefits of affected law enforcement personnel. SECTION 3. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $____________ or so much thereof as may be necessary in fiscal year 2024-2025 for an interdepartmental transfer from the department of accounting and general services to the department of law enforcement for personnel costs, including payroll and fringe benefits. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of accounting and general services. SECTION 4. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $____________ or so much thereof as may be necessary in fiscal year 2024-2025 for an interdepartmental transfer from the judiciary to the department of law enforcement for personnel costs, including payroll and fringe benefits. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the judiciary. SECTION 5. In accordance with section 9 of article VII of the Constitution of the State of Hawaii and sections 37-91 and 37-93, Hawaii Revised Statutes, the legislature has determined that the appropriations contained in this Act will cause the state general fund expenditure ceiling for fiscal year 2024-2025 to be exceeded by $________, or ___ per cent.  The reasons for exceeding the general fund expenditure ceiling are that the appropriations made in this Act are necessary to serve the public interest and to meet the needs addressed by this Act. SECTION 6. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ BY REQUEST